Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,167
Net worth violation; director; powers.

If a health maintenance organization fails to comply with the net worth requirement of section 44-32,138, the director may take appropriate action to assure that the continued operation of the health maintenance organization will not be hazardous to its enrollees.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 76.